District of Columbia statutes.
26-1330

Fiduciary not liable as stockholder; liability of estate and funds.

No person holding stock in such company as personal representative, guardian, or trustee shall be personally subject to any liability as stockholder of such company, but the estate and funds in the hands of such personal representative, guardian, or trustee shall be liable in like manner and to the same extent as the testator or intestate or the ward or the person interested in such trust fund would have been if he had been living and competent to act and hold the stock in his own name.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1308, ch. 854, § 742
June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72,§ 207(f), 27 DCR 2155
1981 Ed., § 26-430.
1973 Ed., § 26-330.